Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property as placed on the last completed assessment roll.

(2) "Eligible county" means any county that borders Puget Sound, that has a population of six hundred thousand or more, and that has an established program for transfer of development rights.

(3) "Employment" means total employment in a county or city, as applicable, estimated by the office of financial management.

(4) "Exchange rate" means an increment of development beyond what base zoning allows that is assigned to a development right by a sponsoring city for use in a receiving area.

(5) "Local infrastructure project area" means the geographic area identified by a sponsoring city under RCW 39.108.120.

(6) "Local infrastructure project financing" means the use of local property tax allocation revenue distributed to the sponsoring city to pay or finance public improvement costs within the local infrastructure project area in accordance with RCW 39.108.150.

(7) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local infrastructure project financing.

(8) "Participating taxing district" means a taxing district that:

(a) Has a local infrastructure project area wholly or partially within the taxing district's geographic boundaries; and

(b) Levies, or has levied on behalf of the taxing district, regular property taxes as defined in this section.

(9) "Population" means the population of a city or county, as applicable, estimated by the office of financial management.

(10) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the assessed value of real property located within a local infrastructure project area, less the property tax allocation revenue value.

(11)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means an amount equal to the sponsoring city ratio multiplied by seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property in a local infrastructure project area resulting from:

(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and improvements are initiated after the local infrastructure project area is created by the sponsoring city;

(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW 84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the local infrastructure project area is created by the sponsoring city;

(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after the local infrastructure project area is created by the sponsoring city.

(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property becomes exempt from property taxation.

(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes an amount equal to the sponsoring city ratio multiplied by seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.

(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed value of real property after the initial year.

(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the assessed value of real property in a local infrastructure project area has not increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:

(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;

(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when the cost is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year; and

(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.

(12)(a) "Public improvements" means:

(i) Infrastructure improvements within the local infrastructure project area that include:

(A) Street, road, bridge, and rail construction and maintenance;

(B) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;

(C) Sidewalks, streetlights, landscaping, and streetscaping;

(D) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;

(E) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority and other facilities that support transportation efficient development;

(F) Park facilities, recreational areas, bicycle paths, and environmental remediation;

(G) Stormwater and drainage management systems;

(H) Electric, gas, fiber, and other utility infrastructures; and

(ii) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support affordable housing;

(iii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas in the local infrastructure project area; or

(iv) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.

(b) Public improvements do not include the acquisition by a sponsoring city of transferable development rights.

(13) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly owned land that are subject to property taxation.

(14)(a) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (i) Regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness; (ii) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (iii) regular property taxes authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.

(b) "Regular property taxes" do not include:

(i) Excess property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043; and

(ii) Property taxes that are specifically excluded through an interlocal agreement between the sponsoring local government and a participating taxing district as set forth in RCW 39.104.060(3).

(15) "Receiving areas," for purposes of this chapter, are those designated lands within local infrastructure project areas in which transferable development rights from sending areas may be used.

(16) "Receiving city" means any incorporated city with population plus employment equal to twenty-two thousand five hundred or greater within an eligible county.

(17) "Receiving city allocated share" means the total number of transferable development rights from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance and rural zoned lands designated under RCW 39.108.050 within the eligible counties allocated to a receiving city under RCW 39.108.070 (1) and (2).

(18) "Sending areas" means those lands within an eligible county that meet conservation criteria as described in RCW 39.108.030 and 39.108.050.

(19) "Sponsoring city" means a receiving city that accepts all or a portion of its receiving city allocated share, adopts a plan for development of infrastructure within one or more proposed local infrastructure project areas in accordance with RCW 39.108.080, and creates one or more local infrastructure project areas, as specified in RCW 39.108.070(4).

(20) "Sponsoring city allocated share" means the total number of transferable development rights a sponsoring city agrees to accept, under RCW 39.108.070(4), from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance and rural zoned lands designated under RCW 39.108.050 within the eligible counties, plus the total number of transferable development rights transferred to the sponsoring city from another receiving city under RCW 39.108.070(5).

(21) "Sponsoring city ratio" means the ratio of the sponsoring city specified portion to the sponsoring city allocated share.

(22) "Sponsoring city specified portion" means the portion of a sponsoring city allocated share which may be used within one or more local infrastructure project areas, as set forth in the sponsoring city's plan for development of infrastructure under RCW 39.108.080.

(23) "Taxing district" means a city or county that levies or has levied on behalf of the taxing district, regular property taxes upon real property located within a local infrastructure project area.

(24) "Transfer of development rights" includes methods for protecting land from development by voluntarily removing the development rights from a sending area and transferring them to one or more receiving areas for the purpose of increasing development density or intensity.

(25) "Transferable development rights" means a right to develop one or more residential units in a sending area that can be sold and transferred.

[ 2011 c 318 s 201.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.